District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

4-204.04

Amount of training incentive payment disregarded.

Repealed.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 404, 29 DCR 1060
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(g), 46 DCR 905
1981 Ed., § 3-204.4.
For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 2(g) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).
See notes to § 4-204.01.